Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1245.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 section to read:Section 2120.1. Pelvic Floor Dysfunction Education.--The Department of Health shall have the power, and its duty shall be, to:(1) Enter into partnerships with health care providers, including obstetricians, gynecologists and urologists and community-based health centers and hospitals to educate individuals on the symptoms, processes and other issues surrounding pelvic floor dysfunction and linked or related conditions.(2) Create informational materials in electronic and physical form, in coordination with the partners described in paragraph (1), which may be distributed to or accessed by individuals who are determined by a health care provider to be experiencing or will soon be experiencing pelvic floor dysfunction and linked or related conditions, including women who are postpartum. Informational materials under this section must include:(i) Symptoms of and treatments for pelvic floor dysfunction and linked or related conditions.(ii) Symptoms of pelvic floor dysfunction and linked or related conditions for which an individual would consult a health care provider.(iii) The biological processes behind pelvic floor dysfunction and linked or related conditions.(iv) Recommendations for women who have given birth to receive a postpartum pelvic floor assessment.(v) Other information that the Department of Health deems necessary to prepare and educate individuals regarding pelvic floor dysfunction and linked or related conditions.20250HB1245PN1394 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1245PN1394 - 3 - 1